Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 3
FINANCE - TREASURER

31-20-301. Bond of treasurer - waiver - duties.

The treasurer shall give a bond to the city or town in its corporate name with good and sufficient sureties, to be approved by vote of the governing body in such sum as it requires, conditioned on the faithful performance of his duties as treasurer of such city or town so long as he shall serve as such treasurer and requiring that, when he vacates such office, he will turn over and deliver to his successor all moneys, books, papers, property, or things belonging to such city or town and remaining in his charge as such treasurer. The governing body of the city or town may waive the requirement of a bond.

The treasurer shall:

Receive all moneys belonging to the city or town and shall keep his books and accounts in such manner as may be prescribed by ordinance. Such books and accounts shall always be subject to the inspection of any member of the governing body.

Keep a separate account of each fund or appropriation and the debits and credits belonging thereto;

Give every person paying money into the treasury a receipt therefor specifying the date of payment and upon what account paid, and he shall also file statements of such receipts with the city or town clerk on the date of his monthly report;

Render an account to the governing body or such officer as may be designated by ordinance, at the end of each month and more often if required, showing the state of the treasury at the date of such account and the balance of money in the treasury. He shall also accompany such accounts with a statement of all moneys received into the treasury and on what account during the preceding month, together with all warrants redeemed and paid by him. Said warrants, with any vouchers held by the treasurer, shall be delivered to the clerk and filed with his account in the clerk's office upon every day of such statement. He shall return all warrants paid by him stamped or marked "paid". He shall keep a register of all warrants redeemed and paid, which shall describe such warrants and show the date, amount, number, the fund from which paid, and the name of the person to whom and when paid.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1129, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 1293, § 17, effective April 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 31-20-301 to 31-20-305 as they existed prior to 1975.

31-20-302. Penalty for using municipal funds.

The treasurer is expressly prohibited from using, either directly or indirectly, the municipal money or warrants in his custody and keeping them for his own use or benefit or that of any other person. Any violation of this provision shall subject him to immediate removal from office by the governing body which is authorized to declare said office vacant, in which case his successor shall be appointed and shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term of such officer so removed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1130, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-306 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-303. Deposits - investments - interest - no liability.

As used in this subsection (1), the term "resolution" means a written resolution duly adopted by a majority vote of the governing body, which vote is entered in its minutes.

Subject to the requirements of part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., in all cities and towns in this state, the treasurer shall deposit all the funds and moneys that come into his possession by virtue of his office, in his name as treasurer or in the name of such other custodian as has been appointed by resolution, in one or more state banks, national banks having their principal office in this state, or, in compliance with the provisions of article 47 of title 11, C.R.S., savings and loan associations having their principal offices in this state which have been approved and designated by resolution. The governing body by resolution may authorize the investment of all or any part of such funds and moneys in any type of security or form of investment authorized by part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., or by any other law of this state. All securities so purchased shall be duly registered in the name of the treasurer or other custodian appointed by resolution and, if issued in a form so permitting, shall be deposited and safely kept by him in the custody of some state or national bank located in this state. The governing body, by resolution, shall establish requirements for the sale or other disposal of securities and for the deposit or reinvestment of any proceeds, subject to the restrictions set forth in this section. For the purposes of investment of funds of the city or town, the governing body of the city or town, by resolution, may appoint one or more custodians of the funds and moneys, and such persons shall give surety bonds in such amount and form and for such purposes as the governing body may require.

Such funds and moneys may be deposited in said banks and savings and loan associations in demand accounts, in interest-bearing savings accounts, or in certificates of deposit for fixed periods of time at such rates of interest as may be negotiated from time to time. All interest credited or received on such deposits shall become a part of the general fund of the city or town or of such other fund as the governing body designates.

No city or town treasurer or member of the governing body who acts in good faith in approving and designating such depository shall be liable for loss of public funds deposited by such treasurer or his deputies by reason of default or insolvency of such depository; nor shall any such treasurer who invests any such funds as provided in this section or any member of the governing body who in good faith authorizes such investment be liable for any loss on account of such investment.

Subject to the requirements of part 7 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., funds of the city or town may be pooled for investment with the funds of other local government entities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1130, § 1, effective July 1; (1) and (2) amended and (3) and (4) repealed, pp. 407, 392, §§ 5, 5, 6, effective January 1, 1976.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 577, § 9, effective June 10.

L. 83:

(4) added, p. 1010, § 3, effective March 29; (1) and (2) amended, p. 1260, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 89:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1114, § 25, effective July 1.

31-20-304. Reports - annual account - publication.

The treasurer shall report to the governing body, as often as required, a full and detailed account of all receipts and expenditures of the city or town as shown by his books up to the time of said report. Annually, by March 1 after the close of the fiscal year, he shall make out and file with the clerk a full and detailed account of all such receipts and expenditures and of all his transactions as such treasurer during the preceding fiscal year and shall show in such account the state of the treasury at the close of the fiscal year, which account the clerk shall immediately cause to be published in a newspaper printed in such city or town if there is one and, if not, by posting the same in a public place in the clerk's office.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1131, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-308 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-305. Collector to keep warrants - books - pay over weekly - receipt.

It is the duty of the collector, if anyone except the treasurer is specially appointed, or the person acting in that capacity to preserve all warrants returned into his hands, and he shall keep such books and his accounts in such manner as the governing body prescribes. Such warrants, books, and all papers pertaining to his office at all times shall be open to the inspection of and subject to the examination of the mayor, any member of the governing body, or any committee thereof. He shall pay over to the treasurer weekly, and more often if required by the governing body, all moneys collected by him, taking such treasurer's receipt therefor, which receipt he shall immediately file with the clerk. The clerk, at the time of filing or on demand, shall give such collector a copy of any such receipt so filed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1131, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-309 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-306. Collector to report - annual statement - publication.

The collector shall make a written report to the governing body, or any officer designated by it, of all moneys collected by him, the account whereon collected, or of any other matter connected with his office when required by the governing body or by any ordinance of the town or city. He shall also annually, by March 1 after the close of the fiscal year, file with the clerk a statement of all moneys collected by him during the year, the particular warrant, special assessment, or account on which collected, the balance of moneys uncollected on all warrants in his hands, and the balance remaining uncollected at the time of the return on all warrants which he returned during the preceding fiscal year to the clerk. The clerk shall publish or post the same as required to be done by section 31-20-304 in regard to the annual report of the treasurer.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1132, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-310 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-20-307. Keeping moneys - inspection of books - paying over.

The collector is expressly prohibited from keeping the moneys of the city or town in his hands or in the hands of any person for his use beyond the time prescribed for the payment of the same to the treasurer. Any violation of this provision will subject him to immediate removal from office. All the city or town collector's papers, books, warrants, and vouchers may be examined at any time by the mayor, clerk, or any member of the governing body. The collector shall pay over every two weeks, or more often if the governing body so directs, all money collected by him from any persons or associations to the treasurer taking his receipt therefor in duplicate, one of which receipts he shall at once file in the office of the clerk.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1132, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-20-311 as it existed prior to 1975.